Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-39-101. Short title — Legislative intent — Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Energy Acquisition Corporations Act.”

It is recognized by the general assembly that the provision of dependable, economical sources of energy to the citizens and residents of the state of Tennessee is vital to the health, welfare and economic well-being of the citizens and residents of the state of Tennessee and that the primary sources of energy in Tennessee are natural gas and electrical power. The general assembly further recognizes that both the market for natural gas and the market for electrical power have undergone major changes in recent years. In order to ensure that the municipal distributors of natural gas and electricity have the flexibility and power to compete for and obtain natural gas and electrical power for redistribution on terms that will result in continuing availability of these energy sources at reasonable rates to the citizens and residents of the state of Tennessee, it is the intent of the general assembly by this chapter to authorize the incorporation of public corporations in the several municipalities of this state to:

Finance, acquire, own, operate, lease and dispose of rights, titles and interest of every kind and nature in natural gas properties located within or outside of the state, including gas in reservoirs or in storage, and including facilities of every kind and nature, both real and personal, for the drilling of wells, extraction of liquids and transportation of gas and liquids;

Contract for the purchase of supplies of natural gas or any substitute for natural gas, including synthetic natural gas, liquefied natural gas, coal gas or other substance useable in lieu of natural gas, from any supplier located inside or outside the state;

Finance, acquire, own, operate, lease and dispose of rights, titles and interest of every kind and nature in electrical production, distribution and transmission facilities located within or outside of the state, including electrical materials and supplies and including facilities of every kind and nature, both real and personal, for the procurement of raw materials for the production of electrical energy;

Contract for the purchase of supplies of electrical power or any substitute for supplies of electricity from any supplier located inside or outside the state; and

Vest such corporations with all powers necessary to enable them to accomplish such purposes.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with such intent, it being hereby determined and declared that the means provided by this chapter are needed to provide for the continued availability to the citizens and residents of the state of natural gas and electrical power at reasonable rates.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4201; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 1; 1999, ch. 345, § 2; 2007, ch. 263, § 1.

Cross-References. Gas companies, title 65, ch. 26.

7-39-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Associated municipality” means the municipality for the benefit of which an energy acquisition corporation is organized;

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, interim certificates or other obligations of a corporation issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Corporation” or “energy acquisition corporation” means a public corporation formed under this chapter, which shall be a public instrumentality of its associated municipality and of the state of Tennessee;

“Energy distribution system” means a system for the distribution of natural gas or electric power that is owned or operated by a municipality or any board or agency of the municipality;

“Governing body” means, with respect to a municipality that is an associated municipality of, or purchaser of gas from, an acquisition corporation established to exercise the powers described in this chapter with respect to natural gas and natural gas substitutes, any board, commission or other instrumentality of such municipality having jurisdiction, control and management of the gas distribution system of that municipality, and, with respect to a municipality that is an associated municipality of, or purchaser of electrical power from, an acquisition corporation established to exercise the powers described in this chapter with respect to electrical power, any board, commission or other instrumentality of such municipality having jurisdiction, control and management of the electrical power distribution system of that municipality. With respect to any action permitted or required to be taken under this chapter by any such board, commission or instrumentality of a county or incorporated city, town or metropolitan government, if such board, commission or instrumentality by resolution waives its right to take such action or if no such board, commission or instrumentality exists, the power to take such action shall be vested in the body in which the general legislative powers of the county or incorporated city, town or metropolitan government are vested. The governing body of a utility district or gas, electric or energy authority shall be the board of commissioners of the utility district or gas, electric or energy authority or such other board or body as shall be vested by statute or private act with jurisdiction, control and management of the energy distribution system of the district or authority. The governing body of an energy acquisition corporation shall be the board of directors of the energy acquisition corporation;

“Municipality” means any county, incorporated city, town or metropolitan government, utility district, energy acquisition corporation or gas, electric or energy authority in this state; and

“Municipally-owned” means owned by a municipality as defined in this chapter.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 2; T.C.A, § 6-4202; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 2; 1999, ch. 345, §§ 3-5; 2007, ch. 263, §§ 2, 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §7-39-102(b) (Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 2; T.C.A. § 6-4202; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 2; 1999, ch. 345 §§ 3-5), concerning qualifications for an incorporator or a director of an energy acquisition corporation, was transferred to §7-39-103 by the code commission in 2005.

7-39-103. Qualfications of incorporator or director of energy acquisition corporation.

An incorporator or a director of an energy acquisition corporation must be a natural person who meets any of the following qualifications:

With respect to a natural person seeking to act as an incorporator or director of an energy acquisition corporation organized or proposed to be organized with respect to and for the benefit of a county or incorporated city, town or metropolitan government, a duly qualified elector of and taxpayer in the county or incorporated city, town or metropolitan government;

With respect to a natural person seeking to act as an incorporator or director of an energy acquisition corporation organized or proposed to be organized with respect to and for the benefit of a utility district or gas, electric or energy authority, a resident and landowner within the boundaries of the utility district or gas, electric or energy authority;

A member of the governing body of the municipality with respect to and for the benefit of which the energy acquisition corporation is organized or proposed to be organized; or

An employee of the energy distribution system of the municipality with respect to which and for the benefit of which the energy acquisition corporation is organized or proposed to be organized.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 2; T.C.A, § 6-4202; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 2; 1999, ch. 345, §§ 3-5; T.C.A. §7-39-102(b); Acts 2007, ch. 263, § 4.